District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-614.04

Review of ratings.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1404, 25 DCR 5740
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-158, § 10(i), 27 DCR 5127
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 803(a), 42 DCR 3684
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(q), 45 DCR 2464

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-615.4.
1973 Ed., § 1-344.4.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of § 101(q) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-614.01.